Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3443
Report.

(1)(a) No later than April 1, 2026, and each April 1 thereafter, the review team shall prepare and submit electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature, the Department of Health and Human Services, and other nonprofit organizations, a report that summarizes the following information for each individual who died by suicide reviewed by the review team in the previous calendar year: (i) Cause of death; (ii) factors contributing to the death; (iii) age; (iv) sex; (v) race; (vi) geographic location at the time of death; and (vii) date of death.

(b) The report shall also include the number of suicide deaths that were not reviewed in the previous calendar year.

(2) The report may include recommendations for actions that may prevent additional suicide deaths and any other information, as determined by the review team.

Laws 2025, LB414, § 6.